Utah statutes.
15-9-107.   Suspension, revocation, or refusal to renew registration.

(1)  The division may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a registration for conduct that would have justified denial of registration under Subsection 15-9-106(2).

(2)  The division may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a certificate of registration only after proper notice and an opportunity for a hearing. Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, applies to this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 74, 2010 General Session

